dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.aff
FLAG long
SFX yN Y 36
SFX yN truire truire/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisant/s' uire
SFX yN truire truit uire
SFX yN truire truits uire
SFX yN truire truite uire
SFX yN truire truites uire
SFX yN truire truit/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisons uire
SFX yN truire truisez uire
SFX yN truire truisent/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisait/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisions uire
SFX yN truire truisiez uire
SFX yN truire truisaient/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisit/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisimes uire
SFX yN truire truisites uire
SFX yN truire truisirent/s' uire
SFX yN truire truira/s' uire
SFX yN truire truirons uire
SFX yN truire truirez uire
SFX yN truire truiront/s' uire
SFX yN truire truirait/s' uire
SFX yN truire truirions uire
SFX yN truire truiriez uire
SFX yN truire truiraient/s' uire
SFX yN truire truise/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisions uire
SFX yN truire truisiez uire
SFX yN truire truisent/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisit/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisissions uire
SFX yN truire truisissiez uire
SFX yN truire truisissent/s' uire
SFX yN truire truisons-nous uire
SFX yN truire truisez-vous uire

SFX yO Y 51
SFX yO detruire detruire/m't's' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisant/m't's' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruit detruire
SFX yO detruire detruits detruire
SFX yO detruire detruite detruire
SFX yO detruire detruites detruire
SFX yO detruire detruis/m' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruis/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruit/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisons detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisez detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisent/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisais/m' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisais/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisait/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisions detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisiez detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisaient/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisis/m' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisis/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisit/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisimes detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisites detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisirent/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruirai/m' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruiras/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruira/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruirons detruire
SFX yO detruire detruirez detruire
SFX yO detruire detruiront/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruirais/m' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruirais/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruirait/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruirions detruire
SFX yO detruire detruiriez detruire
SFX yO detruire detruiraient/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruise/m' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruises/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruise/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisions detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisiez detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisent/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisisse/m' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisisses/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisit/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisissions detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisissiez detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisissent/s' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruis/t' detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisons detruire
SFX yO detruire detruisez detruire

SFX yU N 51
SFX yU uire uire uire
SFX yU uire uisant uire
SFX yU uire ui uire
SFX yU uire uis uire
SFX yU uire uis uire
SFX yU uire uit uire
SFX yU uire uisons uire
SFX yU uire uisez uire
SFX yU uire uisent uire
SFX yU uire uisais uire
SFX yU uire uisais uire
SFX yU uire uisait uire
SFX yU uire uisions uire
SFX yU uire uisiez uire
SFX yU uire uisaient uire
SFX yU uire uisis uire
SFX yU uire uisis uire
SFX yU uire uisit uire
SFX yU uire uisimes uire
SFX yU uire uisites uire
SFX yU uire uisirent uire
SFX yU uire uirai uire
SFX yU uire uiras uire
SFX yU uire uira uire
SFX yU uire uirons uire
SFX yU uire uirez uire
SFX yU uire uiront uire
SFX yU uire uirais uire
SFX yU uire uirais uire
SFX yU uire uirait uire
SFX yU uire uirions uire
SFX yU uire uiriez uire
SFX yU uire uiraient uire
SFX yU uire uise uire
SFX yU uire uises uire
SFX yU uire uise uire
SFX yU uire uisions uire
SFX yU uire uisiez uire
SFX yU uire uisent uire
SFX yU uire uisisse uire
SFX yU uire uisisses uire
SFX yU uire uisit uire
SFX yU uire uisissions uire
SFX yU uire uisissiez uire
SFX yU uire uisissent uire
SFX yU uire uis luire
SFX yU uire uis nuire
SFX yU uire uisons luire
SFX yU uire uisons nuire
SFX yU uire uisez luire
SFX yU uire uisez nuire

SFX yV N 58
SFX yV ire ire ire
SFX yV ire isant ire
SFX yV ire it nfire
SFX yV ire its nfire
SFX yV ire ite nfire
SFX yV ire ites nfire
SFX yV ire is cire
SFX yV ire ise cire
SFX yV ire ises cire
SFX yV ire i ffire
SFX yV ire is ire
SFX yV ire is ire
SFX yV ire it ire
SFX yV ire isons ire
SFX yV ire isez ire
SFX yV ire isent ire
SFX yV ire isais ire
SFX yV ire isais ire
SFX yV ire isait ire
SFX yV ire isions ire
SFX yV ire isiez ire
SFX yV ire isaient ire
SFX yV ire is ire
SFX yV ire is ire
SFX yV ire it ire
SFX yV ire imes ire
SFX yV ire ites ire
SFX yV ire irent ire
SFX yV ire irai ire
SFX yV ire iras ire
SFX yV ire ira ire
SFX yV ire irons ire
SFX yV ire irez ire
SFX yV ire iront ire
SFX yV ire irais ire
SFX yV ire irais ire
SFX yV ire irait ire
SFX yV ire irions ire
SFX yV ire iriez ire
SFX yV ire iraient ire
SFX yV ire ise ire
SFX yV ire ises ire
SFX yV ire ise ire
SFX yV ire isions ire
SFX yV ire isiez ire
SFX yV ire isent ire
SFX yV ire isse ire
SFX yV ire isses ire
SFX yV ire it ire
SFX yV ire issions ire
SFX yV ire issiez ire
SFX yV ire issent ire
SFX yV ire is n.ire
SFX yV ire is ffire
SFX yV ire isons n.ire
SFX yV ire isons ffire
SFX yV ire isez n.ire
SFX yV ire isez ffire

SFX yW N 51
SFX yW ire ire rire
SFX yW ire iant rire
SFX yW ire i rire
SFX yW ire is rire
SFX yW ire is rire
SFX yW ire it rire
SFX yW ire ions rire
SFX yW ire iez rire
SFX yW ire ient rire
SFX yW ire iais rire
SFX yW ire iais rire
SFX yW ire iait rire
SFX yW ire iions rire
SFX yW ire iiez rire
SFX yW ire iaient rire
SFX yW ire is rire
SFX yW ire is rire
SFX yW ire it rire
SFX yW ire imes rire
SFX yW ire ites rire
SFX yW ire irent rire
SFX yW ire irai rire
SFX yW ire iras rire
SFX yW ire ira rire
SFX yW ire irons rire
SFX yW ire irez rire
SFX yW ire iront rire
SFX yW ire irais rire
SFX yW ire irais rire
SFX yW ire irait rire
SFX yW ire irions rire
SFX yW ire iriez rire
SFX yW ire iraient rire
SFX yW ire ie rire
SFX yW ire ies rire
SFX yW ire ie rire
SFX yW ire iions rire
SFX yW ire iiez rire
SFX yW ire ient rire
SFX yW ire isse rire
SFX yW ire isses rire
SFX yW ire it rire
SFX yW ire issions rire
SFX yW ire issiez rire
SFX yW ire issent rire
SFX yW ire is rire
SFX yW ire is sourire
SFX yW ire ions rire
SFX yW ire ions sourire
SFX yW ire iez rire
SFX yW ire iez sourire

SFX yX Y 36
SFX yX nuire nuire/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisant/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nui nuire
SFX yX nuire nuis nuire
SFX yX nuire nuie nuire
SFX yX nuire nuies nuire
SFX yX nuire nuit/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisait/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisaient/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisit/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisimes nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisites nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisirent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuira/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirons nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiront/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirait/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuirions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiriez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuiraient/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuise/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisit/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissions nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissiez nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisissent/s' nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisons-nous nuire
SFX yX nuire nuisez-vous nuire

SFX yY Y 4
SFX yY ccire ccire/n'q'd'l'm't's' occire
SFX yY ccire ccis/q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccise/q' occire
SFX yY ccire ccises/q' occire

SFX yZ N 9
SFX yZ rire rire rire
SFX yZ rire rit rire
SFX yZ rire rits rire
SFX yZ rire rite rire
SFX yZ rire rites rire
SFX yZ rire ris rire
SFX yZ rire ris rire
SFX yZ rire rit rire
SFX yZ rire ris rire
