dictionaries/fr_FR/fr_FR.dic
autodetruire/yO()
circoncire/yV()
confire/yV()
deconfire/yV()
entre-detruire/yN()
entre-nuire/yX()
frire/yZ()
luire/yU()
nuire/yU()
occire/yY()
reluire/yU()
rire/yW()
sourire/yW()
suffire/yV()
